Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.300

Retention and preservation of records of patients.

Unless specified otherwise by the department, a nursing home shall retain and preserve all records which relate directly to the care and treatment of a patient for a period of no less than eight years following the most recent discharge of the patient; except the records of minors, which shall be retained and preserved for a period of no less than three years following attainment of the age of eighteen years, or ten years following such discharge, whichever is longer.

If a nursing home ceases operations, it shall make immediate arrangements, as approved by the department, for preservation of its records.

The department shall by regulation define the type of records and the information required to be included in the records to be retained and preserved under this section; which records may be retained in photographic form pursuant to chapter 5.46 RCW.

[ 1995 1st sp.s. c 18 s 44; 1981 1st ex.s. c 2 s 24; 1975 1st ex.s. c 175 s 2.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—Effective date—1995 1st sp.s. c 18: See notes following RCW 74.39A.030.

Severability—Effective dates—1981 1st ex.s. c 2: See notes following RCW 18.51.010.